South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S493.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 40-33-20(19) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (19)(a) "Certified Registered Nurse Anesthetist" or "CRNA" means an advanced practice registered nurse who: (a)(i) has successfully completed an advanced, organized formal CRNA education program at a minimum of the master's level accredited by the national accrediting organization of this specialty area and that is recognized by the board; (b)(ii) is certified by a board-approved national certifying organization;  and (c)(iii) demonstrates advanced knowledge and skill in the delivery of anesthesia services. (b) A CRNA must practice in accordance with approved written guidelines developed under supervision of a licensed physician or dentist or approved by the medical staff within the facility where practice privileges have been granted. (c) A certified registered nurse anesthetist may only use the abbreviation "CRNA" or a variation or subdesignation of CRNA to indicate that the person is practicing as certified registered nurse anesthetist. A certified registered nurse anesthetist is prohibited from using any medical or medical specialty designation, including, but not limited to, those designations identified in Section 40-27-20(36)(g) either alone or in combination with any nursing abbreviation. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----